Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 181A.823 is amended to read:
181A.823. (1) A law enforcement agency or public body may not:
(a) Except as  required by state or federal law, deny services, benefits, privileges or opportunities
to an individual in custody, or on parole,  probation or post-prison supervision, on the basis of known
or suspected immigration status, the  existence of an immigration detainer, hold, notification or other
related federal immigration request or a civil immigration warrant;
(b) Inquire into or collect information about an  individual’s immigration or citizenship status or
country of birth unless:
(A) The information is required to  advance an investigation into a violation of state or local
criminal law;
(B) The information is submitted to a  court of this state, whether orally or in writing, in con-
nection with a proceeding in that court; or
(C) As necessary to determine the individual’s eligibility for a  benefit that the individual is
seeking; or
(c) Provide information , or enter into  an agreement to provide information,  about an indi-
vidual in the custody of the  public body or law enforcement agency to a federal immigration au-
thority for the purpose of civil immigration enforcement, except:
(A) As may be required by a judicial subpoena issued as part  of a court proceeding or by an-
other compulsory court-issued legal process; [ or]
(B) As may be required to effect the  international extradition to this state and return
of a person charged  with or convicted of crimes in this state and for whom a warrant of
arrest has been issued; or
[(B)] (C) To  the extent that the information is available to the general public and under the
same terms and conditions as the information is available to the general public.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1)(c)(A) of this section, a judicial subpoena does not  include an
administrative subpoena created and signed by a federal immigration authority.
(3) To ensure compliance with all  treaty obligations, including consular notification, and state
and federal laws, on the commitment or detainment of an individual,  a law enforcement agency shall
explain to the individual in writing, with interpretation into another language if requested:
Enrolled Senate Bill 277 (SB 277-INTRO) Page 1
(a) The individual’s right to refuse to  disclose the individual’s nationality, citizenship or immi-
gration status; and
(b) That disclosure of the  individual’s nationality, citizenship or immigration status may result
in civil or criminal immigration enforcement, including removal from the United States.
(4) Any person may bring a civil action against a law enforcement agency or public body  that
violates subsections (1) to (3) of this section to enjoin the violation.
(5) Subsection (1)(b)  of this section does not prohibit the Oregon Health Authority or the De-
partment of Human Services from inquiring into or collecting data about country of  birth in con-
nection with data collected in accordance with uniform standards adopted under ORS 413.161.
SECTION 2.  ORS 181A.826 is amended to read:
181A.826. (1) Public facilities, property, moneys, equipment, technology  or personnel may not be
used for the  purpose of investigating, detecting, apprehending, arresting, detaining or holding indi-
viduals for immigration enforcement.
(2) Actions with a purpose described in subsection (1) of this section  include, but are not limited
to, the following:
(a) Granting a federal immigration agency access  to an area of a facility that is not normally
open to the public.
(b) Supporting or assisting a federal agency in immigration enforcement, including  but not lim-
ited to any of the following:
(A) Providing information, including  but not limited to an individual’s contact information,
country of birth, custody status, release date,  parole, probation or post-prison supervision appoint-
ment dates or times, or home or work address, except as provided in ORS 181A.823;
(B) Investigating or interrogating individuals for immigration enforcement; or
(C) Establishing traffic perimeters for the purpose of supporting or facilitating immigration
enforcement.
(3)(a) If a public body receives a  communication or request from a federal agency that relates
to immigration enforcement, other than a  judicial subpoena described in ORS 181A.823 (1)(c)(A)[ ,]
or a communication or request made pursuant to an  international extradition under ORS
181A.823 (1)(c)(B),  the public body shall decline the request and document the communication or
request. The documentation described  in this subsection must be provided to the director or other
similar management personnel of the public body.
(b) The public body shall  submit the information documented under this subsection to the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission pursuant to procedures established by the commission.  The
commission shall require at least  monthly submission of the information described in this subsection.
(c) A public body shall adopt internal procedures to carry out this subsection.
(4)(a) The commission shall publish and continually  update, on a website operated by or on be-
half of the commission, an entry for each communication or request  described in subsection (3) of
this section,  the public body that received the communication or request, the federal agency in-
volved in the communication or that made  the request and a summary of the public body’s response
to the communication or request.
(b) The information contained on the website described in this  subsection may not contain any
personally identifiable information of the individuals involved in the communication or  request, in-
cluding of an individual targeted by federal immigration authorities,  an individual who reported the
communication or request,  an individual who witnessed the communication or request or report of
the communication or request or the family members of an individual described in this paragraph.
(c)(A) Information obtained by the commission under this subsection may be used  only for sta-
tistical purposes and coordination with the sanctuary violation reporting mechanism established
under ORS 181A.827.
(B) Information  described in this subsection that may reveal the identity of an individual de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this subsection is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(C) Pursuant to a request from the Department of Justice, the commission may release  to the
department information  described in this subsection that is necessary to investigate a report made
Enrolled Senate Bill 277 (SB 277-INTRO) Page 2
to the  sanctuary violation reporting mechanism established under ORS 181A.827 if the information
is used to support an individual described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) Not later than July 1, 2022, and at least annually thereafter, the commission shall  issue a
report that summarizes  the information reported to the commission and published on the website
described in this subsection. The commission  shall provide the report to the Governor, the Legisla-
tive Assembly, the district attorneys of this state, the Department of State  Police, each law
enforcement agency in this state and the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(5) Any  person may bring a civil action against a law enforcement agency or public body that
violates subsection (1) of this section to enjoin the violation.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 277 (SB 277-INTRO) Page 3